Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Chapter 27. Board of Armory Commissioners

§ 541.
Board of Armory Commissioners; members.

The Governor, the Adjutant and Inspector General, and the senior commander of the Vermont Army National Guard shall, ex officio, constitute the Board of Armory Commissioners. The Governor shall be the Chair of the Board and the Adjutant and Inspector General shall be the Secretary.

HISTORY:

Amended

2021, No. 10

, § 21.

§ 542.
Acquisition, maintenance, and disposal of property for National Guard use.

In the name of the State, the Board shall be responsible for the real estate and personal property of the National Guard. The Board may acquire or purchase, maintain, and dispose of by sale or otherwise real estate and personal property. Upon determination by the Board that real estate is to be disposed of, the disposal shall be at fair market value, and the proceeds shall be allocated to future capital construction acts.

HISTORY:

Amended

1969, No. 261

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. April 7, 1970;

1973, No. 223

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. April 4, 1974;

2007, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 51, eff. June 9, 2008;

2013, No. 51

, § 44, eff. May 29, 2013;

2021, No. 10

, § 22.

§ 543.
Location; plan of construction; contracts.

The Board may determine the location of armories and their plan of construction and may make all contracts necessary for the purchase, erection, and maintenance of the armories of the National Guard.

HISTORY:

Amended

2021, No. 10

, § 23.

§ 544.
Issuance of warrants.

Upon request of the Board, the Commissioner of Finance and Management shall issue warrants for sums as necessary to carry out the provisions of sections 541 and 543 of this chapter, subject to the limitations set forth in section 542 of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1959, No. 328

(Adj. Sess.), § 8; amended

1963, No. 39

, § 6, eff. April 11, 1963;

1983, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 5(b);

2021, No. 10

, § 24.

§ 545.
Use of armories; rules.

The Board shall adopt rules governing the use and occupancy of the National Guard’s armories and property, which shall be posted in a conspicuous location in the National Guard’s buildings. A member of the National Guard who violates the rules shall be deemed guilty of a military offense, punishable as a court-martial shall direct pursuant to the provisions of sections 941 and 942 of this title.

Fees collected under this section for rental of armories shall be credited to the Armory Rentals Special Fund and shall be available to the Military Department to offset the cost of providing the services.

HISTORY:

Amended

1999, No. 49

, § 212;

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 119;

2021, No. 10

, § 25.